South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-1-130.  State funds and local government funds shall not be used to fund the legal representation of individuals who are not United States citizens or who are unlawfully present in the United States. "Legal representation" includes immigration proceedings and appeals. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----